Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-219
Act, how cited.

Sections 55-201 to 55-219 may be cited as the State Guard Act.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 14, p. 450;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-414;

R.S.1943, § 55-219.